Hawaii statutes.
[§378-27] Exception. Nothing in this
part shall be deemed to:

(1) Repeal or affect any law or ordinance or
government rule or regulation having the force and effect of law;

(2) Apply to lie detector tests administered by any
law enforcement agency;

(3) Apply to the United States and any subdivision
thereof;

(4) Conflict with or affect the application of
security regulations in employment established by the United States or the
State; or

(5) Apply to psychological tests administered by a
law enforcement agency to determine the suitability of a candidate for
employment with the law enforcement agency. [L 1985, c 241, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next